Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-369
Substantial mental impairment, defined.

Substantial mental impairment shall mean a substantial disorder of thought, mood, perception, orientation, or memory that grossly impairs judgment, behavior, or ability to live independently or provide self-care as revealed by observation, diagnosis, investigation, or evaluation.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 22.